lij.aff
SET UTF-8
LANG lij
TRY eaiontscrdmlugpvhfâæbòàçxqzéöîìñôêùëäykïwjèûEAIONTSCRDMLUGPVHFÂÆBÒÀÇXQZÉÖÎÌÑÔÊÙËÄYKÏWJÈÛ'

MAP 6
MAP aàâäAÀÂÄ
MAP eeèéêëæEeÈÉÊËÆ
MAP iìîïj(ii)(ji)IÌÎÏJ(II)(JI)
MAP oòóôöOÒÓÔÖuùûüUÙÛÜ
MAP cçszCÇSZ
MAP ñn(nh)(nn)(nn-)ÑN(NH)(NN)(NN-)

REP 40
REP ae æ
REP è æ
REP e æ
REP ç s
REP s ç
REP b bb
REP bb b
REP c cc
REP cc c
REP çç ç
REP çç s
REP d dd
REP dd d
REP f ff
REP ff f
REP g gg
REP gg g
REP gl gg
REP l ll
REP ll l
REP m mm
REP mm m
REP nn- ñ
REP n- ñ
REP nh ñ
REP nn ñ
REP n m
REP p pp
REP pp p
REP r rr
REP rr r
REP s ss
REP ss s
REP t tt
REP tt t
REP v vv
REP vv v
REP z zz
REP zz z
REP xx x

FLAG long

FORBIDDENWORD !!
NEEDAFFIX --
NOSUGGEST **

# 1st conjugation, stressed prefix (formed from present ind. 1s)
SFX aa Y 5
SFX aa o i [^cgi]o  # present ind. 2s, base case: lavo
SFX aa o hi [cg]o   # present ind. 2s, -co/-go case: pago
SFX aa io i io      # present ind. 2s, -io case (non-syllabic -i-): mangio
SFX aa o a o        # present ind. 3s
SFX aa o an o       # present ind. 3p

# 1st conjugation, unstressed prefix (formed from present ind. 1p)
SFX AA Y 3
SFX AA emmo æ [^cgh]emmo  # present ind. 2p, base case: lavemmo
SFX AA emmo iæ [cg]emmo  # present ind. 2p, -cemmo/-gemmo case: mangemmo
SFX AA hemmo æ hemmo      # present ind. 2p, -chemmo/-ghemmo case: paghemmo

# Note: no need to explicitly inflect present ind. 1s and 1p,
# as these are the base forms from which all others are obtained
# via suffixation.
